apertium-tur-uzb.tur.lexc
LEXICON REGULAR-NEGATIVE 

NECE ;
CONDITIONAL ;
NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
IMPERATIVE ;
CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
FUTURE ;
FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
FUTURE-PERFECT ;
IMPERFECTIVE ;
PAST ;
PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;


LEXICON V-TV-DIR-IR
! Ex. al>mak - al>ır>ım - al>dır>mak

%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-DIR-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL;



LEXICON V-TV-IR-AR


%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-IR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-DIR-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;

%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL;


LEXICON V-IV-DIR-IR

%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REC-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IV-REF-DIR-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AORIST-IR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL;



LEXICON V-TV-DIR-AR 
! Ex. yap>mak - yap>ar>ım - yap>dır>mak

%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-DIR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;    
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL;
%<v%>%<tv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL;


LEXICON V-TV-T-AR 

%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-T-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-T-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-T-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-T-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-AR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL;
%<v%>%<tv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL;


LEXICON V-IV-T-IR 

%<v%>%<iv%>: CAUS-T-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-IR;
!%<v%>%<iv%>: REC-T-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: REF-T-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<iv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL;
%<v%>%<iv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL;




LEXICON V-TV-T-IR 

%<v%>%<tv%>: CAUS-T-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR;
!!%<v%>%<tv%>: REC-T-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PASS-T-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: REF-T-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FINITE-VERBS-IR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NEG ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NECE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: NON-FINITE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: GERUND ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: CONDITIONAL-PAST ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EVIDENTIAL-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: IMPERFECTIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONDITIONAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PAST-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: PRESENT-CONTINUOUS ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: FUTURE-EVIDENTIAL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: EXHORTATIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: JUSSIVE ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: AORIST-AR-PERFECT ;
%<v%>%<tv%>: ABIL-AR-CONDITIONAL;
%<v%>%<tv%>: DOUBLE-EVIDENTIAL;

LEXICON Verbs 
et:et%{v%} V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "make"
istifa% et:istifa% et%{v%} V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "resign"
kıs:kıs V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "put down, reduce"
kuşan:kuşan V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "gird oneself with"
naklet:naklet V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "recount, transport"
öğret:öğret V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "teach"
özen:özen V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "imitate someone"
resmet:resmet V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "illustrate"
salıver:salıver V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "demobilise"
ser:ser V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "spread over"
silk:silk V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "shake something out"
tak:tak V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "affix"
tüket:tüket V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "consume"
tut:tut V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "keep"
üstlen:üstlen V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "undertake"
yalıt:yalıt V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "isolate"
yas:yas V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "stave"
yoğur:yoğur V-TV-DIR-IR  ; ! "knead"
yum:yum V-TV-DIR-AR  ; ! "clench"
akset:akset V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "be heard"
aktar:aktar V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "transfer"
alış:alış V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "familiarise with"
ayrış:ayrış V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "decompose"
bahset:bahset V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "talk about"
beğen:beğen V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "like, advire"
bilgilen:bilgilen V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "learn"
boğ:boğ V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "choke"
boşal:boşal V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "be emptied"
bulun:bulun V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "to be found"
çel:çel V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "tempt"
çıkar:çıkar V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "eject, remove"
defnet:defnet V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "bury"
diz:diz V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "align"
dolaş:dolaş V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "walk around"
uyustur:uyustur V-TV-T-AR ; ! "wake up"
eleştir:eleştir V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "cricitize"
es:es V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "blow"
giy:giy V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "wear"
gör:gör V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "see"
havalan:havalan V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "take off"
hükmet:hükmet V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "rule over"
ısıt:ısıt V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "heat"
kap:kap V-TV-DIR-AR ; ! "snatch"
iç:iç V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "drink"
aş:aş V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "go beyond / exaggerate"
geç:geç V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "pass"
kaç:kaç V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "escape"
şaş:şaş V-TV-IR-AR ; ! "wonder"
alazla:alazla V-TV-T-IR ; ! "scorch"
ayrımsa:ayrımsa V-TV-T-IR ; ! "perceive"
deneyle:deneyle V-TV-T-IR ; ! "to experiment with"
dikizle:dikizle V-TV-T-IR ; ! "pry"
dorukla:dorukla V-TV-T-IR ; ! "fill"
dürtükle:dürtükle V-TV-T-IR ; ! "poke"
kırbaçla:kırbaçla V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "sjambok"
kotar:kotar V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "dish up"
lanetle:lanetle V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "curse"
omuzla:omuzla V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "shoulder"
öze:öze V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "be wordy"
pudrala:pudrala V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "powder"
sırtla:sırtla V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "take on one's back"
tekmele:tekmele V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "kick"
yakınsa:yakınsa V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "converge"
zorla:zorla V-TV-T-IR  ; ! "compel"
büyükse:büyükse V-TV-T-IR ; ! "esttem highly"
dişle:dişle V-TV-T-IR ; ! "nibble"
garantile:garantile V-TV-T-IR ; ! "guarentee"
ısmarla:ısmarla V-TV-T-IR ; ! "treat"
kirlen:kirlen V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "be raped"
kuvvetlen:kuvvetlen V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "strengthen"
onurlan:onurlan V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "be honoured"
savaş:savaş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "battle, fight"
sinirlen:sinirlen V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "get angry"
tapın:tapın V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "idolise"
tutun:tutun V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "adsorb"
utan:utan V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "shy"
yanaş:yanaş V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "lend oneself to"
yerin:yerin V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "be sorry"
yönel:yönel V-IV-DIR-IR  ; ! "tend towards"
aldan:aldan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "be deceived, tricked"
atış:atış V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "bicker"
başgöster:başgöster V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "arise"
bozul:bozul V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "be destroyed"
çatış:çatış V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "conflict"
davran:davran V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "act, treat"
elver:elver V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "be convenient"
gururlan:gururlan V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "be proud of"
inan:inan V-TV-DIR-IR ; ! "believe"
kaçın:kaçın V-IV-DIR-IR ; ! "avoid"
kışkır:kışkır V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "provoke"
konakla:konakla V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "stop over"
külle:külle V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "cover with ashes"
morar:morar V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "become bruised"
panikle:panikle V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "get into a panic"
püskür:püskür V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "spout"
sağal:sağal V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "recover"
seyrel:seyrel V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "become rare"
soğu:soğu V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "get cold"
terle:terle V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "sweat"
ucuzla:ucuzla V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "become cheap"
uyu:uyu V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "sleep"
yavaşla:yavaşla V-IV-T-IR  ; ! "slow down"
acı:acı V-IV-T-IR ; ! "pity something"
bocala:bocala V-IV-T-IR ; ! "falter"
damla:damla V-IV-T-IR ; ! "drop off"
duraksa:duraksa V-IV-T-IR ; ! "come to a stop"
fırla:fırla V-IV-T-IR ; ! "shoot ahead"
havuzla:havuzla V-IV-T-IR ; ! "drydock"
ışılda:ışılda V-IV-T-IR ; ! "shine"
biks:biks V-TV-T-AR ; ! "biks"
